Utah statutes.
48-2c-1803.   Mandatory indemnification of managers.

Unless limited by its articles of organization, a company shall indemnify a manager who was successful, on the merits or otherwise, in the defense of any proceeding, or in the defense of any claim, issue, or matter in the proceeding, to which he was a party because he is or was a manager of the company, against reasonable expenses, including attorney's fees, incurred by him in connection with the proceeding or claim with respect to which he has been successful.



Enacted by Chapter 260, 2001 General Session

